California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------

6111.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of law and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, on and after January 1, 1980, the State Lands Commission or the Division of State Lands shall not adopt nor publish a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted before January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from such provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties Generally [6201. - 6225.]

6201.

The commission may periodically classify any or all state land for its different possible uses, and, when it is deemed advisable, may require the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Conservation, the Department of Food and Agriculture, or any other officer, organization, agency, or institution of the state government to make that classification. It is the duty of any such officer, organization, agency, or institution to make that classification and to submit a report thereon upon the application of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 9.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

The commission may make surveys and subdivisions of lands belonging to the state to be sold, leased, or to have the boundary established, and the county recorder shall file maps thereof, made by the commission, without cost to the state.

Such maps shall be the official maps of the surveys and subdivisions, and all patents, leases, or boundary line agreements issued for the lands shall refer to the maps so filed. Such maps of state lands shall be legibly drawn, printed or reproduced by a process guaranteeing a permanent record in black on tracing cloth or polyester base film. If ink is used on a polyester base film, the ink surface
 shall be coated with a suitable substance to insure permanent legibility. The size of each sheet shall be 18 by 26 inches. A marginal line shall be drawn completely around each sheet, leaving an entire blank margin of one inch. The scale of the map shall be large enough to show all details clearly and enough sheets shall be used to accomplish this end. The particular number of the sheets and the total number of sheets comprising the map shall be stated on each of the sheets and its relationship to each adjoining sheet shall be clearly shown.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1594.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

On or before the first Monday in March in each year, the commission shall make out and transmit to the assessor of each county where lands or lots lie that have been sold by the State, for which certificates of purchase, patents, or deeds have issued, during the year preceding, certified lists of such lands or lots, giving a description of the lands or lots, the names of the purchasers, and the amount of principal unpaid, if any, on the first Monday in March.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6204.

The commission shall, when required, survey and mark the boundary lines of counties and cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.

The commission shall provide the necessary record books and cause all lists or patents for lands from the United States to be recorded therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6206.5.

The commission is hereby empowered to apply to the United States Department of the Interior for patents to the numbered school sections in place and to accept patents, in accordance with an act of Congress approved June 21, 1934 (Public No. 440-73d Congress) entitled “An Act Authorizing the Secretary of the Interior to issue patents to the numbered school sections in place, granted to the States by the act approved February 22,
 1889, by the act approved January 25, 1927 (44 Stat. 1026), and by any other act of Congress.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 643, Sec. 32.   (SB 832)   Effective November 2, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6207.

The commission shall keep separate accounts and records in relation to each class of lands to which the State is entitled, which shall show:

(a) The number of the survey or location, and the date of the approval.

(b) The name of the locator, the description of the lands by legal subdivisions, the price per acre at which they are sold, the amount paid, the date of payment, and the number and date of the certificate of purchase.

(c) The date of the patent, when it has been
 issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6208.

The commission shall also keep plats of such lands, upon which all approved locations and surveys shall be designated by their numbers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6209.

When certificates of purchase or patents are issued, the fact shall be noted on the plats.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.

The commission shall represent the State in all contests between it and the United States in relation to public lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.1.

When the commission desires to take testimony under the provisions of the act of Congress to quiet land titles in California, passed July 23, 1866, or any act amendatory or supplementary thereof, it shall request the United States Supervisor of Surveys to fix a place, convenient of access by the witnesses, and the time for taking such testimony.

It may require the Attorney General to attend and represent the State at the taking of such testimony. Not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall be allowed in any one year for traveling expenses pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.2.

The commission may withdraw from sale any of the public lands belonging to the State and may restore any or all public lands so withdrawn, or other public lands, for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.3.

The commission may grant easements and rights-of-way to the Department of Transportation to or over any of the public lands of the state for the purposes of rights-of-way for highways and for use in protecting highways from damage or destruction by natural forces.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.4.

No lands owned by the State which lands front upon or are near to any lake, navigable stream or other body of navigable water, convenient access to which is not provided by public road or roads, or otherwise, shall ever be sold, leased or rented, without reserving to the people of the State an easement across the lands for convenient access to such waters.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6210.3 (as amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 887) by Stats. 1949, Ch. 269.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.4a.

All conveyances by the State of the sixteenth and thirty-sixth sections, or lands acquired in lieu thereof, or of swamp and overflowed lands shall be made subject to any existing easements or rights-of-way issued by the State prior to the time of conveyance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 240.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.5.

No lands owned by the State, which lands provide the only convenient means of access to other lands owned by the State, shall ever be sold, leased or rented without reserving therefrom to the State and its successors in interest in the other lands, an easement for convenient access to the other lands.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6210.4 by Stats. 1949, Ch. 269.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.6.

Notwithstanding Section 6210.5, the commission is not required to reserve an easement on school lands if it determines that selling the school lands without the easement is in the best interests of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 715, Sec. 3.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.7.

The commission may amend or terminate any lease, easement, or contract under its jurisdiction, with the consent of the other party thereto.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6210.6 by Stats. 1951, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.8.

Whenever a navigable river or slough becomes abandoned and is no longer useful for navigation, the commission may sell, for cash, or exchange for lands having equal or greater value, such abandoned river or slough channel to the abutting property owners or to anyone having an equitable interest therein. A patent for the land sold shall be issued in the name of the applicant. The commission shall send the patent to the Governor, together with a certificate stating that the laws in relation thereto have been complied with, that payment in full has been made, and that the person named in the prepared patent is entitled to it. The patent so issued shall inure to the benefit of
 the assigns, grantees, or successors in interest of said original applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.9.

If the commission has public land, including school land, tide or submerged lands, and lands subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries, to which there is no access available, it may, in the name of the state, acquire by purchase, lease, gift, exchange, or, if all negotiations fail, by condemnation, a right-of-way or easement across privately owned land or other land that it deems necessary to provide access to such public land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6211.

(a) Whenever a parcel of timbered land under the jurisdiction of the commission is totally surrounded by, or is contiguous to, a national forest or a state forest, the commission may, if it is in the best interests of the state to do so, and after 10 days’ prior notice to the Secretary of the Resources Agency for the receipt of comments, provide for the harvesting of timber from that land at the same time as the orderly harvesting of the surrounding or adjacent federal-owned or state-owned timber is conducted. In carrying out this section,
 the commission may enter into agreements with the United States or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for the inclusion of timbered lands under the jurisdiction of the commission within a total parcel to be offered for timber harvesting contracts.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, timber from lands under the jurisdiction of the commission shall not be sold to any California division of a primary manufacturer, or to any person for resale to a primary manufacturer, who does either of the following:

(1) Uses that timber at any plant not located within the United States, unless it is sawn on four sides to dimensions not greater than 4 inches by 12 inches.

(2) Within one year prior to the bid date and one year after the termination of the contract, sells unprocessed timber which is harvested from
 private timberlands and is exported into foreign commerce. For the purposes of this section, “unprocessed timber” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 4650.1.

(c) Any purchaser of timber from lands under the jurisdiction of the commission who makes use of the timber in violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is prohibited from making any further purchases of timber from any such lands for a period of five years.

(d) The commission may adopt appropriate regulations to prevent the substitution of timber from lands under its jurisdiction for timber exported from private timberlands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 176.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6212.

(a) Upon appropriation of moneys by the Legislature for the purposes of this section, the commission shall, within two years, administer a coastal hazard and legacy oil and gas well removal and remediation program to do all of the following:

(1) Complete an assessment of legacy oil and gas wells and other coastal hazards along the California coastline, including conducting aerial surveys and dives, and determining high-priority hazards and legacy oil and gas wells to remediate.

(2) Survey, study, and monitor oil seepage in state waters and tidelands under its jurisdiction to determine oil seepage locations, rates, and environmental impacts, and partner with experts to facilitate innovative
 solutions.

(3) In cooperation with the
 Geologic Energy Management Division, begin the process of remediating improperly abandoned legacy oil and gas wells that have a high risk of leaking oil and are hazardous to public health and safety and the environment.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code and any other law requiring approval by a state officer of gifts, bequests, devises, or donations, the commission may seek and accept on behalf of the state any gift, bequest, devise, or donation whenever the gift and the terms and conditions thereof will aid in actions undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, until January 1, 2026, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the activities and accomplishments of the program for
 the prior year. The commission may include this information in the annual report it submits pursuant to Section 8618.

(2) (A) On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees in the Legislature, including, at minimum, all of the following:

(i) The Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water.

(ii) The Senate Committee on Environmental Quality.

(iii) The Senate Committee on Appropriations.

(iv) The Senate Budget Subcommittee 2 on Resources, Environmental Protection, Energy and Transportation.

(v) The Assembly Committee on Natural
 Resources.

(vi) The Assembly Committee on Appropriations.

(vii) The Assembly Budget Subcommittee 3 on Resources and Transportation.

(B) The report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall cover the life of the program and shall include information necessary to aid the Legislature in determining the effectiveness of the coastal hazard and legacy oil and gas well removal and remediation program and the extent to which funding for the program should be reauthorized. At minimum, the report shall include the following information:

(i) Activities and accomplishments of the program.

(ii) Implementation challenges and, to the extent available, potential solutions to these challenges.

(iii) Program expenditures.

(iv) The amount of any gift, bequest, devise, or donation accepted by the commission on behalf of the state pursuant to subdivision (b), and the name, location, and organization type of the donor. The commission may provide aggregate information for some or all of the donations, if appropriate, as determined by the commission.

(v) Recommendations on whether the program should be reauthorized, any changes that should be included in the reauthorizing legislation, and activities and priorities for the program after July 1, 2028, if the program is reauthorized.

(d) The commission shall prioritize its activities under this section based on available resources.

(e) For
 purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Coastal hazards” are legacy oil and gas wells and human-made structures that have been orphaned, including piers, jetties, groins, seawalls, and facilities associated with past oil extraction and other operations, that pose a hazard to public health and safety. Coastal hazards may include, but are not limited to, wood or steel piles or piling, sheet metal pilings, H piles and H beams, well casings, well caissons, railroad irons, cables, angle bars, pipes, pipelines, rip rap, and wood beams and structures.

(2) “Legacy oil and gas wells” are wells drilled before current abandonment standards, where there is little or no information on the well’s abandonment procedure and there is no viable company with the responsibility to reabandon the well should it start leaking or pose a threat to the environment or to public health
 and safety.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 17.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2028.    Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6212.2.

The commission may, under such rules and regulations as it may prescribe, issue permits for the taking of cores or other samples by means of drilling operations or other methods on or under any lands under the jurisdiction of the commission for the purpose of obtaining geological information to be used in assessing the nature and extent of any mineral interest reserved to the state, preparing environmental documents, locating nuclear or other energy-related plant sites, making soil surveys, conducting foundation exploration and oceanographic research, and making studies of geological hazards, flood control, harbor works, and other similar matters not involving an activity of
 commercial exploration or exploitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

6212.3.

(a) The commission may authorize, by permit, the conduct of geophysical surveys on state lands under its jurisdiction, including granted and ungranted tidelands and submerged lands and the beds of navigable waterways, subject to terms and conditions as the commission shall specify to ensure public safety and protection of the environment.

(b) No permit shall be required by the commission for any geophysical survey performed in support of dredging to maintain or increase the depth of navigation channels, anchorages, or berthing areas.

(c) The commission shall adopt regulations to aid in the implementation of subdivision (a). The regulations shall include conditions that address and minimize the potential impacts to aquatic life or to the marine and coastal environment that might arise from geophysical surveys performed on state lands under its jurisdiction, including granted and ungranted tidelands and submerged lands and the beds of navigable waterways.

(d) The commission may promote compliance with the permit requirements through appropriate actions, including any of the following:

(1) Providing educational outreach to increase awareness of permitting regulations and enforcement actions.

(2) Making a toll-free telephone number available to the public to report permit violators.

(3) Issuing cease and desist orders to permit violators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 600, Sec. 2.   (AB 1274)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6213.

Whenever it appears by final decree of any court of competent jurisdiction that title to any land subject to sale by the State was obtained, or sought to be obtained, by fraudulent means, or in any manner contrary to the laws of this State relating to the acquisition of its public domain, all payments made in the interest of the fraudulent title shall revert to the State without suit. The commission shall thereupon cancel all evidence of title to any such land and shall restore the land to public entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6213.5.

(a) (1) The commission shall consult, and enter into any necessary negotiations, with the owners of the property known as Martins Beach, consisting of two parcels of land, APN: 066-330-230 and APN: 066-330-240, in the unincorporated area of the County of San Mateo, to acquire a right-of-way or easement, pursuant to Section 6210.9, for the creation of a public access route to and along the shoreline, including the sandy beach, at Martins Beach at the South Cabrillo Highway.

(2) This section does not prohibit the owners of the property from voluntarily providing public access to and along the shoreline at Martins Beach upon terms acceptable to the
 commission.

(b) If the commission is unable to reach an agreement to acquire a right-of-way or easement or the owners do not voluntarily provide public access pursuant to subdivision (a) by January 1, 2016, the commission may acquire a right-of-way or easement, pursuant to Section 6210.9, for the creation of a public access route to and along the shoreline, including the sandy beach, at Martins Beach at the South Cabrillo Highway, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Title 7 (commencing with Section
 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The commission shall consult and enter into negotiations with local stakeholders, including, but not limited to, nonprofit entities and local and regional governments and governmental entities, to address the ongoing management and operation of any property acquired pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 922, Sec. 1.   (SB 968)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6214.

Fees shall be charged and collected by the commission pursuant to its rules and regulations for the following:

(a) Certificates of purchase or duplicates thereof,

(b) Patents and certified copies of records thereof,

(c) For certifying a contested case to superior court,

(d) For certifying copies of papers,

(e) Such other fees as are allowed by
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

6215.

As to lands heretofore sold by this State with a reservation to the State of a one-sixteenth interest in the oil and gas or other minerals therein, pursuant to Chapter 303 of the Statutes of 1921, and where it appears that there are or may be deposits of oil and gas in such lands the commission may enter into agreements with respect thereto in the manner provided by Section 6815 of this code with respect to lands owned by the State, or the commission may consent to the inclusion of such lands with the lands of other persons under a cooperative or unit plan of development or operation of a pool or field if it appears that the purpose of such plan is the conserving of the natural
 resources of any single oil or gas pool or field and if it is determined by the commission to be necessary or advisable in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 685.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.

This section is enacted for the purpose of declaring the scope and extent of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities and jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission, but nothing herein shall be construed as limiting any power, duty, purpose, responsibility or jurisdiction heretofore or by this code vested in or conferred upon the commission.

(a) Upon the enacting of the State Lands Act of 1938 the Legislature intended to and did vest in the commission all those powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities and jurisdiction of the Department of Finance as set forth in Section 6102 of this code, and of the Chief
 of the Division of State Lands, and the Division of State Lands, including the full authority, as provided by law, to administer, sell, lease or dispose of the public lands owned by this state or under its control, including not only school lands but tidelands, submerged lands, swamp and overflowed lands, and beds of navigable rivers and lakes. The commission was further authorized to provide for the extraction of minerals and oil and gas from any or all of such lands, but its authority and jurisdiction over such lands was not and is not now limited thereto.

(b) The provisions of Section 48 of the State Lands Act of 1938, added thereto by Chapter 646 of the Statutes of 1939, as codified in Section 6301 of this code, shall hereafter supersede and control over any other provisions of law, whether general or special, relating to any tidelands or submerged lands or the beds of navigable rivers, streams, lakes, bays, estuaries, inlets or straits,
 without regard to whether any of such lands contain or may contain oil, gas or other minerals, and any such other provisions of law in conflict therewith are repealed. 

(c) Any and all acts of the State Lands Commission heretofore performed by it in pursuance of Section 48 of the State Lands Act of 1938 are hereby confirmed, ratified and validated, without regard to whether the lands affected thereby contain or might contain oil, gas or other minerals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 607.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.1.

The commission may remove or cause to be removed any artificial structures or obstructions from ungranted lands under its jurisdiction if the commission determines that the removal is appropriate and the Attorney General advises that there is no legal recourse to compel other responsible parties to effect that removal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 10.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.5.

The commission may prescribe such rules and regulations for the noncommercial hobby collection of minerals from state lands as are in the best interests of the state. Nothing in this section shall prevent other state agencies from setting more definitive limits on hobby collecting on lands over which they have a proprietary interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.

With the exception of revenue derived from state school lands and from sources described in Sections 6217.6, 6301.5, 6301.6, 6855, and Sections 8551 to 8558, inclusive, and Section 6404 (insofar as the proceeds are from property that has been distributed or escheated to the state in connection with unclaimed estates of deceased persons), the commission shall deposit all revenue, money, and remittances received by the commission under this division, and under Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session, in the General Fund. Out of those funds deposited in the General Fund, sufficient moneys shall be made available each fiscal year for the following purposes:

(a) Payment of refunds, authorized by the commission, out of
 appropriations made for that purpose.

(b) Payment of expenditures of the commission as provided in the annual Budget Act.

(c) Payments to cities and counties of the amounts specified in Section 6817 for the purposes specified in that section, out of appropriations made for that purpose.

(d) Payments to cities and counties of the amounts agreed to pursuant to Section 6875, out of appropriations made for that purpose.

(e) (1) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be transferred to the Land Bank Fund and, notwithstanding Section 8610, shall be available, upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act, for the purpose of implementing the commission’s coastal hazard and legacy oil and gas well
 removal and remediation program provided in Section 6212.

(2) For each fiscal year from the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2027–28 fiscal year, inclusive, an amount sufficient to bring the unencumbered balance of the Land Bank Fund available for the purpose of implementing the commission’s coastal hazard and legacy oil and gas well removal and remediation program provided in Section 6212 to two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be transferred to the Land Bank Fund and, notwithstanding Section 8610, shall be available, upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act, for the purpose of implementing the commission’s coastal hazard and legacy oil and gas well removal and remediation program provided in Section 6212.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 645, Sec. 3.   (SB 44)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.1.

(a) This section and the process described in this section governs the expenditure of any funds received by the State of California from the federal government for the purposes of salmon and steelhead trout conservation and restoration, the expenditure of funds authorized for the Coastal Watershed Salmon Habitat Program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 79104.200) of Chapter 6 of Division 26 of the Water Code, and the expenditure of funds appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for salmon and steelhead trout conservation
 and restoration from the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Fund pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 5096.650) of Chapter 1.696 of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “project” means an activity that improves fish habitat in coastal waters utilized by salmon and anadromous trout species.

(c) (1) The Department of Fish and Game shall grant funds from the Salmon and Steelhead Trout Restoration Account in the Resources Trust Fund, as follows:

(A) At least 87.5 percent of the funds shall be allocated as project grants through the existing grant program operated by the fisheries management program of the Department of Fish and Game.

(B) Not
 more than 12.5 percent of the funds may also be used for project contract administration activities and biological support staff.

(2) (A) A project shall require the consent of a willing landowner, and emphasize the development of coordinated watershed improvement activities.

(B) Projects that restore habitat for salmon and anadromous trout species that are eligible for protection as listed or candidate species under state or federal endangered species acts shall be given top funding priority.

(C) Projects shall be cost-effective and treat causes and not symptoms of fish habitat degradation. Projects may implement instream, riparian, water quality, water quantity, and watershed prescriptions and shall be designed to restore the structure and function of fish habitat.

(3) Any grant funds allocated to a project that exceed the actual cost of completing the project shall be returned to the Salmon and Steelhead Trout Restoration Account.

(d) (1) A citizen’s advisory committee shall be appointed by the Director of Fish and Game to give advice on the grant program.

(2) The advisory committee shall consist of seven representatives recommended by the California Advisory Committee on Salmon and Steelhead Trout, one representative from the agriculture industry, one representative from the timber industry, one representative of public water agency interests, one academic or research scientist with expertise in anadromous fisheries restoration, and three county supervisors from coastal counties in which anadromous trout exist. The county supervisor members shall be
 recommended by the California State Association of Counties.

(3) The advisory committee shall provide oversight of, and recommend priorities for, grant funding under this section. In making funding decisions, the Department of Fish and Game shall consider the project selection priorities established by the advisory committee.

(4) Members of any advisory committee established for these purposes shall be reimbursed for travel and incidental expenses related to the performance of their duties under this section. Reimbursement for the advisory committee created pursuant to this section shall be made from the funds designated in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). Reimbursement for other Department of Fish and Game salmon and steelhead trout advisory committees shall be funded by appropriate sources.

(5) If a member of the advisory committee, or a member of his or her immediate family, is employed by a grant applicant, the employer of a grant applicant, or a consultant or independent contractor employed by a grant applicant, the advisory committee member shall make that disclosure to the other members of the committee, and shall not participate in reviewing or making recommendations on the grant application of that applicant.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), the money in the Salmon and Steelhead Trout Restoration Account shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Not less than 65 percent of the money shall be used for salmon habitat protection and restoration projects. Of that amount, at least 75 percent shall be used for watershed (upslope) and riparian area protection and restoration activities. These activities may include, but are not limited to, grants to
 acquire and install fish screens to protect juvenile and adult salmon and steelhead trout from entrapment in water diversions, and grants to remove substandard culverts, stream crossings, and bridges that constitute barriers to spawning of salmon and steelhead trout and passage of fish. These funds may also be used for the acquisition, from willing sellers, of conservation easements for riparian buffer strips along coastal rivers and streams to protect salmon and steelhead trout habitat or for projects that protect and improve water quality and quantity.

(2) Up to 35 percent of the money shall be allocated for any of the uses listed in this paragraph.

(A) Watershed evaluation, assessment, and planning necessary to develop a site-specific and clearly prioritized plan to implement watershed improvements.

(B) Multiyear
 grants for watershed planning and project monitoring and evaluations.

(C) Watershed organization support and assistance.

(D) Project maintenance and monitoring after the project implementations are complete.

(E) Public school watershed and fishery conservation education projects.

(F) Private sector technical training and education project grants, including teaching private landowners about practical means of improving land and water management practices that, if implemented, will contribute to the protection and restoration of salmon stream habitat; scholarship funding for workshops and conferences that teach restoration techniques; operation of nonprofit restoration technical schools; and production of restoration training and education workshops and
 conferences.

(G) Fish and wildlife habitat improvements, as defined by Section 4793, and authorized under the California Forestry Incentive Program (CFIP).

(H) The salmon restoration project of the California Conservation Corps.

(I) The state’s share of the federal Watershed Stewards Program.

(J) Monitoring projects that utilize protocols approved by the Department of Fish and Game and the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) to provide baseline or trend data, or both, for anadromous fish populations or the physical and biological factors known to be limiting recovery.

(K) Artificial propagation programs designed to restore depleted stocks of salmonids that comply with the directives
 of the joint Department of Fish and Game and NMFS Hatchery Operations Review Committee.

(f) The advisory committee, in any fiscal year, may make a recommendation to the Department of Fish and Game to allocate money from the Salmon and Steelhead Trout Restoration Account for the purposes stated in subdivision (e), but in different percentage requirements than the 65/35 split stated in paragraphs (1) and (2) of that subdivision. Following that recommendation, the Director of Fish and Game may suspend the percentage requirements stated in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e) for that fiscal year only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.2.

Notwithstanding Section
 16304.1 of the Government Code, a disbursement in liquidation of an encumbrance for a project funded pursuant to the Coastal Watershed Salmon Habitat Program, as identified in Section 6217.1, may be made before or during the four years following the last day an appropriation is available for encumbrance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 734, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Safe Drinking Water, Water Quality and Supply, Flood Control, River and Coastal Protection Bond Act of 2006, an initiative approved by the voters at the November 7, 2006, statewide general election, makes available the sum of one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) in bond funds for bay-delta and coastal fishery restoration projects.

(2) Of the funds made available, up to forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) is available for coastal salmon and steelhead fishery restoration projects that support the development and implementation of species recovery plans and strategies for salmonid species listed as threatened or endangered under state or federal law.

(b) From the forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) available for coastal salmon and steelhead fishery restoration projects pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75050, five million two hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($5,293,000) is appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for the purposes of coastal salmon and steelhead fishery restoration projects, including the Coastal Salmonid Monitoring Plan. The Department of Fish and Game shall not allocate more than two million five hundred twenty thousand dollars ($2,520,000) of these funds for the Coastal Salmonid Monitoring Plan.

(c) (1) Except for the funds annually appropriated for the Coastal Salmonid Monitoring Plan, and as provided in paragraph (3), the process governing the expenditure of funds described in Section 6217.1 shall be applied to the expenditure of funds available for coastal salmon and steelhead fishery restoration projects pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75050 that are allocated by the Department of Fish and Game pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The funds annually allocated to the Coastal Salmonid Monitoring Plan are exempt from the requirements of Section 6217.1.

(3) If there is a conflict between a provision of this section and a provision of Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001), the provision of Division 43 shall govern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 760, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.5.

Except for the revenues distributed pursuant to Section 3826, all net revenues, moneys, and remittances from the use of school lands and lieu lands shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Teachers’ Retirement Fund and shall be expended pursuant to Section 24412 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 20.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.6.
